Hawaii statutes.
[§708-836.6] Unauthorized entry into motor
vehicle in the second degree. (1) A person commits the offense of
unauthorized entry into a motor vehicle in the second degree if the person
intentionally or knowingly enters into a motor vehicle without being invited,
licensed, or otherwise authorized to do so.

(2) Unauthorized entry into a motor vehicle in
the second degree is a misdemeanor. [L 2006, c 230, §3]

COMMENTARY ON §708-836.6

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, added the misdemeanor crime of
unauthorized entry into motor vehicle in the second degree. House Standing
Committee Report No. 665-06.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next